test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTI_AM_IMP_waabandam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA+Imp - am - waabndam :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     
     #immediate forms eat the -am theme!
     #negative forms keeping n# ... lost in VAI
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+2Sg+0SgO: waabndan
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamok
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+21Pl+0SgO: waabndaa
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+21Pl+0Pl: waabndaanin
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Del+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamookan
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Del+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamookeg
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Del+21Pl+0SgO: waabndamookang
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamngen #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamangen #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamngegon #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamangegon #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+21Pl+0SgO: waabndanziidaa
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+21Pl+0PlO: waabndanziidaanin #book indicates suff is -daanin, but gives exe of waabndanziidaanin
